District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2801

Licenses for business or profession; application; transfer of license; signing and sealing.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 622, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 1
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 550, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(a), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(c), 45 DCR 1172

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2801.
1973 Ed., § 47-2301.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-261, title II, § 2003(pp)(6) ( 46 DCR 3142), eff. April 20, 1999, amends § 47-2805 without reference to its prior repeal by D.C. Law 12-86.